Georgia statutes. TITLE 37 Mental Health
CHAPTER 1 Governing and Regulation of Mental Health

Cross references.

Mental competency proceedings for juveniles, T. 15, C. 11, A. 4.

Administrative rules and regulations.

Emergency receiving, evaluating and treatment facilities, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-1.

Pretrial examination and for commitment because of incompetency to stand trial, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Human Services, Chapter 290-4-3.